North Dakota, session 69, SB2289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 14-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Disclosure of court records to law enforcement.
A court record maintained in relation to a matter involving a domestic violence protection
order under section 14 - 07.1 - 02 must be disclosed and provided upon request to the office of a
law enforcement officer to enable the law enforcement officer to carry out the duties of the law
enforcement officer.
Page No. 1 25.1228.02000